Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.070

Examinations.

(1) License examinations shall be held by the director at least once each year at a time and place to be designated by the director. Application to take an examination shall be filed with the director at least fifteen days prior to the examination date. The department shall give each applicant written notice of the time and place of the next examination. The applicant shall be deemed to have passed an examination if the applicant attains a grade of not less than seventy-five percent in each examination.

(2) An applicant for a license may take his or her written examination after completing the educational requirements and before completing the course of training required under RCW 18.39.035.

[ 2019 c 442 s 6; 2005 c 365 s 5; 1996 c 217 s 3; 1981 c 43 s 6; 1965 ex.s. c 107 s 4; 1937 c 108 s 5; RRS s 8317. Prior: 1909 c 215 ss 8, 11.]